en: Flugelhorn trigger type: Main tuning slide trigger; None; Third-valve slide trigger; Other
ru: Тип триггера флюгельгорна: Триггер главного настроечного крона; Нет; Триггер крона третьего вентиля; Другое
ro-RO: Tipul declanșator al fligornului: Trăgaci pentru culisa de acordaj principală; Niciunul; Declanșator pentru culisa pistonului 3; Altele
zh-CN: 柔音号扳机类型: 主调音管触发器; 无; 第三键滑管触发器; 其他
fr: Type de trigger du bugle: Gâchette de coulisse d’accord principale; Aucune; Gâchette de la troisième coulisse; Autre
da: Aftrækker-type for flugelhorn: Udløser til hovedstemmetræk; Ingen; Udløser til tredje ventils stemmetræk; Andet
vi: Loại cần gạt kèn flugelhorn: Cò trượt chỉnh âm chính; Không; Cò trượt van thứ ba; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de gatilho do flugelhorn: Gatilho de pompa de afinação principal; Nenhum; Gatilho de pompa do terceiro pisto; Outro
es: Tipo de activador del fliscorno: Gatillo para bomba de afinación principal; Ninguno; Gatillo para bomba del tercer pistón; Otro
sv: Typ av trigger för flygelhorn: Trigger för huvudstämbygel; Ingen; Trigger för 3:e ventilbygel; Övrigt
hr-HR: Tip pokretača krilnog roga: Poluga za ugađanje glavnog potega; Nema; Okidač potezka trećeg ventila; Ostalo
pt-PT: tipo fliscorne: Gatilho da bomba de afinação principal; Nenhum; Gatilho da bomba do terceiro pistão; Outro
tr: Flugelhorn tetikleyici tipi: Ana akort pompası tetiği; Yok; Üçüncü valf pompası tetiği; Diğer
cs: Typ spouštěče křídlovky: Dolaďovač hlavního ladicího snížce; Žádný; Dolaďovač snížce 3. ventilu; Ostatní
lt-LT: Fliugelhornio trigerio tipas: Pagrindinis derinimo slankiklio paleidiklis; Nėra; Trečiojo vožtuvo slankiklio svirtelė; Kita
hu: Szárnykürt ravasz típusa: Főhangoló huzat trigger; Nincs; Harmadik szelep huzat trigger; Egyéb
ja: フリューゲルホルンのトリガータイプ: 主管抜差管トリガー; なし; 第3抜差管トリガー; その他
pl: Flugelhornwyzwalacz typu: Klucz na głównym krągliku strojeniowym; Brak; Klucz na trzecim krągliku zaworowym; Inny
sk-SK: Typ spúšťača krídlovky: Spúšťač hlavného ladiaceho ťahu; Žiadny; Páčka tretieho ťahu; Iné
th: ประเภทกลไกที่ช่วยปรับความยาวท่อจูนเสียง: ทริกเกอร์สไลด์จูนเสียงหลัก; ไม่มี; ทริกเกอร์สไลด์วาล์วที่สาม; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип спусък на флюгелхорн: Тригер за главния цуг за настройване; Без; Тригер за кроната на трети вентил; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta sprožilca krilnega roga: Sprožilec glavnega uglasitvenega potega; Brez; Sprožilec tretjega ventila; Drugo
zh-TW: 柔音號調音觸發器類型: 主調音管扳鍵; 無; 第三活塞調音管扳鍵; 其他
nl: Bugel triggertype: Trigger voor hoofdstempomp; Geen; Trigger voor derde ventielpomp; Overige
de: Art des Flügelhorn-Triggers: Trigger am Hauptstimmzug; Keiner; Trigger am 3. Ventilzug; Sonstiges
fi: Flyygelitorven vireenkorjaimen tyyppi: Pääviritysputken liipaisin; Ei mitään; Kolmannen venttiiliputken liipaisin; Muu
ko: 플루겔호른 트리거 유형: 메인 튜닝 슬라이드 트리거; 없음; 3번 밸브 슬라이드 트리거; 기타
it: Tipo di trigger del flicorno: Trigger pompa d'intonazione principale; Nessuno; Trigger pompa terzo pistone; Altro
nb: Flygelhorn utløsertype: Trigger for hovedstemmebøyle; Ingen; Trigger for tredje ventilbøyle; Annet
el: Τύπος στοιχείου ενεργοποίησης φλικόρνου: Κύριο trigger κουρδίσματος; Κανένα; Trigger 3ης βαλβίδας; Άλλο